Rhode Island, session 2025, SB789.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17-65 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17 entitled "Licensing
of Healthcare Facilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17-65. Transparency of ownership in healthcare facilities.
(a) Any operator or operators of a nursing facility shall file with the department of health
information of ownership including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) The name, address, and a description of the interest held by each of the following
persons:
(i) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns any interest in the land on
which the facility is located;
(ii) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns any interest in the building
in which the facility is located;
(iii) Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns any interest in any mortgage,
note, deed of trust, or other obligation secured, in whole or in part, by the land on which or building
in which the facility is located;
(iv) Any person who, directly or indirectly, has any interest as lessor or lessee in any lease
or sub-lease of the land on which or the building in which the facility is located;
(v) Any person who is the ultimate and actual owner of the land, building, mortgages, and
leases of the nursing facility and any lessee of the land or building; and
(vi) The operator or operators of the nursing facility.

(2) If any person named in subsection (a)(1) of this section is a partnership or limited
liability company, then the name and address of each partner or member.
(3) If any person named in subsection (a)(1) of this section is a corporation, other than a
corporation whose shares are traded on a national securities exchange or are regularly quoted in an
over-the-counter market or which is a commercial bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association, then the name and address of each officer, director, stockholder and, if known, each
principal stockholder and controlling person of such corporation.
(4) If any corporation named in subsection (a)(1) of this section is a corporation whose
shares are traded on a national securities exchange or are regularly quoted in an over-the-counter
market or which is a commercial bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association, then the name
and address of the principal executive officers and each director and, if known, each principal
stockholder of such corporation.
(b) In order to promote greater transparency, the department of health shall, upon request,
furnish to the public all documents and information received pursuant to this section.
(c) As used in this section, the term “operator” means the licensee and also includes the
complete ownership entity above the actual entity holding the license.
(d) Any operator that fails to file, in whole or in part, the ownership information required
in accordance with subsection (a) of this section or willingly or knowingly files false or incorrect
ownership information, may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, be subject to the penalties
set forth in §§ 23-17-8 and 23-17-8.1. The director, in his or her discretion, may require that a
financial audit be conducted of the nursing facility at the operator’s expense and may impose a fine
of the greater of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or the amount of facility assets diverted to
undisclosed interest holders.
SECTION 2. Chapter 23-17 of the General Laws entitled "Licensing of Healthcare
Facilities" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-17-12.12. Withdrawal of equity or assets..
(a) On or after July 1, 2025, no nursing facility licensed under this chapter may withdraw
equity or transfer assets which, in the aggregate, exceed three percent (3%) of such facility’s total
reported annual revenue for patient care services, without prior written approval of the director.
Notification shall be made in a form acceptable to the licensing agency by certified mail. Total
reported annual revenue shall be based on the facility’s most recently filed annual BM-64 with the
department of human services, or alternative form prescribed by the director.
(b) The director shall make a determination to approve or disapprove a request for
withdrawal of equity or assets under this section within sixty (60) days of the date of receipt of the
LC001426 - Page 2 of 4

written request from the facility.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001426
========
LC001426 - Page 3 of 4